Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1702
Legislative intent; recodification.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of sections 79-101 to 79-1703 constitute a recodification of Chapter 79 of the Revised Statutes of Nebraska. The purpose of Laws 1996, LB 900, is to reorganize the laws within Chapter 79 and to modernize terminology. Sections 79-101 to 79-1703 should not be construed to change the meaning, intent, application, or effect of any provision in Chapter 79 as such existed prior to July 19, 1996. Article names and part names printed in Laws 1996, LB 900, are for informational purposes only and are not part of the law.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1012.